District of Columbia statutes.
47-319.04

Reports.

The Committee shall submit to the Council reports on the status of the Fiscal Year 1996 budget initiatives each month or as requested by the Council.

Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 704, 43 DCR 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-319.4.